Tennessee statutes. Title 24 Evidence and Witnesses
Chapter 7 Admissibility of Evidence
24-7-118. DNA analysis — Admissibility in evidence.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “DNA analysis” means the process through which deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) in a human biological specimen is analyzed and compared with DNA from another biological specimen for identification purposes.

In any civil or criminal trial, hearing or proceeding, the results of DNA analysis, as defined in subsection (a), are admissible in evidence without antecedent expert testimony that DNA analysis provides a trustworthy and reliable method of identifying characteristics in an individual's genetic material upon a showing that the offered testimony meets the standards of admissibility set forth in the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting any party in a civil or criminal trial from offering proof that DNA analysis does not provide a trustworthy and reliable method of identifying characteristics in an individual's genetic material, nor shall it prohibit a party from cross-examining the other party's expert as to the lack of trustworthiness and reliability of such analysis.

In any civil or criminal trial, hearing or proceeding, statistical population frequency evidence, based on genetic or blood test results, is admissible in evidence to demonstrate the fraction of the population that would have the same combination of genetic markers as was found in a specific biological specimen. For purposes of this subsection (c), “genetic marker” means the various blood types or DNA types that an individual may possess.

Acts 1991, ch. 480, § 3; T.C.A., §24-7-117.

Compiler's Notes. Former §24-7-118, concerning voluntary acknowledgement of paternity, was transferred to §24-7-113 in 2000.

Cross-References. DNA analysis, collection and preservation of human biological specimens, §38-6-113.

DNA analysis, collection of biological specimens from persons convicted of certain offenses, §40-35-321.

Post-conviction DNA analysis, title 40, ch. 30, part 3.

24-7-119. Introduction of reproduction in place of original.

If any business, institution, member of a profession or calling, or any department or agency of government, in the regular course of business or activity has kept or created any writing, recording or photograph of any act, transaction, occurrence or event, and in the regular course of business has caused any or all of the same to be recorded, copied, or reproduced by any photographic, photostatic, microfilm, microcard, miniature photographic, electronic image or other process which accurately reproduces or forms a durable medium for so reproducing the original, the original may be destroyed in the regular course of business unless its preservation is required by law.

Such reproduction, when satisfactorily identified, is as admissible in evidence as the original itself in any judicial or administrative proceeding whether the original is in existence or not, and an enlargement or facsimile of such reproduction is likewise admissible in evidence if the original reproduction is in existence and available for inspection under direction of court.

The introduction of a reproduced record, enlargement or facsimile does not preclude admission of the original.

Acts 1998, ch. 995, § 1.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 1001 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

24-7-120. Child's testimony—Closed circuit television.

In a criminal case where the victim of any of the offenses listed in subsection (e) was thirteen (13) years of age or younger at the time the offense was committed, the court may order the child's testimony be taken outside the courtroom by means of two-way closed circuit television, hereafter referred to as “CCTV.” Prior to entering such an order, the trial judge must make a case-specific finding of necessity that:

The particular child involved would be traumatized;

The source of the trauma is not the courtroom generally, but the presence of the defendant; and

The emotional distress suffered by the child would be more than de minimis, such that the child could not reasonably communicate.

If the testimony of a child is ordered to be taken by two-way CCTV, it shall be taken during the judicial proceeding and the following rules shall apply:

Only the prosecuting attorney, the attorney for the defendant, and the judge may question the child;

The operators of CCTV shall make every effort to be unobtrusive;

Only the following persons shall be permitted in the room with the child while the child testifies by CCTV:

The prosecuting attorney;

The attorney for the defendant;

An interpreter, where necessity dictates;

The operators of CCTV equipment;

Court security personnel, where required;

A parent, counselor or therapist; and

Any person whose presence, in the opinion of the court, contributes to the well-being of the child, including a person who has dealt with the child in a therapeutic setting concerning the offense;

The child's testimony shall be memorialized by video-taped recording;

During the child's testimony by CCTV, the judge, jury and the defendant shall remain in the courtroom;

The judge and the defendant shall be allowed to communicate with those persons in the room where the child is testifying by any appropriate electronic method; and

The defendant shall not be allowed to enter the room where the child is testifying by way of CCTV, except where the defendant is acting as an attorney pro se.

This section shall not be interpreted to preclude, for the purpose of identification of the defendant, the presence of both the victim and the defendant in the courtroom at the same time.

This section shall also apply to a witness who was not the victim of any of the offenses set out in subsection (e) but who was thirteen (13) years of age or younger at the time the offense which gave rise to the criminal case was committed; provided, there is an individual finding of necessity by the trial judge that conforms to the requirements of this section.

The offenses to which this section applies are:

Aggravated sexual battery, as defined in § 39-13-504;

Rape of a child, as defined in § 39-13-522;

Incest, as defined in § 39-15-302;

Aggravated child abuse, as defined in § 39-15-402;

Kidnapping, as defined in § 39-13-303;

Aggravated kidnapping, as defined in § 39-13-304;

Especially aggravated kidnapping, as defined in § 39-13-305;

Criminal attempt, as defined in § 39-12-101, to commit any of the offenses enumerated within this subsection (e);

Trafficking for commercial sex act as defined in § 39-13-309; and

Patronizing prostitution as defined in § 39-13-514.

Acts 1998, ch. 1086, § 1; 2013, ch. 251, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 1086, § 2 applies to all applicable criminal trials occurring on or after July 1, 1998.

Cross-References. Admissibility into evidence of audio-visually recorded testimony in child sexual abuse proceedings, §24-7-117.

24-7-121. Child support payment records.

The department of human services child support payment records shall be the official records for all payments which have been appropriately sent to the central collection and distribution unit pursuant to § 36-5-116.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule of evidence to the contrary, a computer printout or copy, by telecopier facsimile or otherwise, an electronic mail copy or copy obtained by way of internet access, of the child support payment screen which is generated from the Tennessee child support enforcement system (TCSES) operated by the department or its contractors shall be admitted into evidence as a nonhearsay, self-authenticating document in all judicial and administrative proceedings without the need for certification by a records custodian.

No conclusive presumption of correctness shall attach to such record following admission, but the record shall constitute prima facie evidence of its correctness and shall be subject to rebuttal by alternative or conflicting documentary evidence of payment of the support obligation.

In order to implement the provisions of subsection (a) and to provide access to any other requesting persons, the department shall develop child support program policies and procedures which allow the department, through its staff or its contractors, to provide copies of payment information from the TCSES child support payments screens utilized by the department or its contractors to any person requesting such information. The department may provide such information in any suitable manner which provides the information necessary for judicial or administrative proceedings under subsection (a) including, but not limited to, the transmission of the hard-copy prints of the TCSES child support payment screens by facsimile or by transmission by any electronic means, and may, specifically, make such payment records available through electronic mail of the record, or by internet access to information contained on TCSES. The department may establish a reasonable fee for such services.

Any individual who knowingly alters, or who assists any individual to alter, any information obtained from the department pursuant to this section and such altered information is utilized for the purposes of establishing, enforcing, or modifying child or spousal support or defending such actions, or for the purposes of defending or prosecuting any contempt action involving child or spousal support, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

For purposes of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (UIFSA), compiled in title 36, chapter 5, parts 21-29, the department or its contractors shall be considered custodians of the support records subject to such act.

In the event that any testimony regarding payment records is required by any state officer, employee or contractor of the department in any child support case, no personal appearance shall be required and such officer, employee or contractor of the department shall have the option to appear in person or to testify by telephonic or other suitable electronic means or by affidavit. In no event shall any state officer, employee or contractor of the department be required to testify in any proceeding unless such officer, employee or contractor of the department has personal knowledge of the facts underlying such payment record.

Acts 2000, ch. 922, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

24-7-122. Medical records.

As used in this section, “medical records” means all written clinical information that relates to the treatment of individuals, when the information is kept in an institution.

Medical records or reproductions of medical records, when duly certified by their custodian, physician, physical therapist or chiropractor, need not be identified at the trial and may be used in any manner in which records identified at the trial by these persons could be used. The records shall be accompanied by a statement signed by the person containing the following information:

The person has authority to certify the records;

The copy is a true copy of all the records described in the subpoena; and

The records were prepared by the personnel of the company acting under the control of the company, in the ordinary course of business.

When records or reproductions of records are used at trial pursuant to this section, the party desiring to use the records or reproductions in evidence shall serve the opposing party with a copy of the records or reproductions no later than sixty (60) days before the trial, with notice that the records or reproductions may be offered in evidence, notwithstanding any other rules or statutes to the contrary.

Acts 2006, ch. 842, § 1.

24-7-123. Admission of video recording of interview of child describing sexual conduct.

Notwithstanding any of this part to the contrary, a video recording of an interview of a child by a forensic interviewer containing a statement made by the child under thirteen (13) years of age describing any act of sexual contact performed with or on the child by another is admissible and may be considered for its bearing on any matter to which it is relevant in evidence at the trial of the person for any offense arising from the sexual contact if the requirements of this section are met.

A video recording may be admitted as provided in subsection (a) if:

The child testifies, under oath, that the offered video recording is a true and correct recording of the events contained in the video recording and the child is available for cross examination;

The video recording is shown to the reasonable satisfaction of the court, in a hearing conducted pretrial, to possess particularized guarantees of trustworthiness. In determining whether a statement possesses particularized guarantees of trustworthiness, the court shall consider the following factors:

The mental and physical age and maturity of the child;

Any apparent motive the child may have to falsify or distort the event, including, but not limited to, bias or coercion;

The timing of the child's statement;

The nature and duration of the alleged abuse;

Whether the child's young age makes it unlikely that the child fabricated a statement that represents a graphic, detailed account beyond the child's knowledge and experience;

Whether the statement is spontaneous or directly responsive to questions;

Whether the manner in which the interview was conducted was reliable, including, but not limited to, the absence of any leading questions;

Whether extrinsic evidence exists to show the defendant's opportunity to commit the act complained of in the child's statement;

The relationship of the child to the offender;

Whether the equipment that was used to make the video recording was capable of making an accurate recording; and

Any other factor deemed appropriate by the court;

The interview was conducted by a forensic interviewer who met the following qualifications at the time the video recording was made, as determined by the court:

Was employed by a child advocacy center that meets the requirements of § 9-4-213(a) or (b); provided, however, that an interview shall not be inadmissible solely because the interviewer is employed by a child advocacy center that:

Is not a nonprofit corporation, if the child advocacy center is accredited by a nationally recognized accrediting agency; or

Employs an executive director who does not meet the criteria of § 9-4-213(a)(2), if the executive director is supervised by a publicly elected official;

Had graduated from an accredited college or university with a bachelor's degree in a field related to social service, education, criminal justice, nursing, psychology or other similar profession;

Had experience equivalent to three (3) years of fulltime professional work in one (1) or a combination of the following areas:

Child protective services;

Criminal justice;

Clinical evaluation;

Counseling; or

Forensic interviewing or other comparable work with children;

Had completed a minimum of forty (40) hours of forensic training in interviewing traumatized children and fifteen (15) hours of continuing education annually;

Had completed a minimum of eight (8) hours of interviewing under the supervision of a qualified forensic interviewer of children;

Had knowledge of child development through coursework, professional training or experience;

Had no criminal history as determined through a criminal records background check; and

Had actively participated in peer review;

The recording is both visual and oral and is recorded on film or videotape or by other similar audiovisual means;

The entire interview of the child was recorded on the video recording and the video recording is unaltered and accurately reflects the interview of the child; and

Every voice heard on the video recording is properly identified as determined by the court.

The video recording admitted pursuant to this section shall be discoverable pursuant to the Tennessee Rules of Criminal Procedure.

The court shall make specific findings of fact, on the record, as to the basis for its ruling under this section.

The court shall enter a protective order to restrict the video recording used pursuant to this section from further disclosure or dissemination. The video recording shall not become a public record in any legal proceeding. The court shall order the video recording be sealed and preserved following the conclusion of the criminal proceeding.

Acts 2009, ch. 413, § 1; 2015, ch. 320, § 1.

24-7-124. Results of radar, laser or similar devices used to measure the speed of a motor vehicle — Results of a breathalyzer or similar device to measure blood alcohol content.

In any judicial or administrative proceeding in which the results of a radar, laser or similar device used to measure the speed of a motor vehicle are being introduced for the purpose of proving the speed of the motor vehicle or the conduct of the driver of the vehicle, such results shall not be admissible for such purposes unless the law enforcement officer operating the device has been trained pursuant to guidelines established by the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration or the Tennessee peace officer standards and training (POST) commission.

In any judicial or administrative proceeding in which the results of a breathalyzer or similar device used to measure the alcohol content in a person's blood are being introduced for the purpose of proving the alcohol content in a person's blood or the intoxication of such person, such results shall not be admissible for such purposes unless the law enforcement officer operating the device has been trained by a recognized organization in the field as qualified to operate the device used.

Acts 2010, ch. 703, § 1.

Cross-References. Speed limits, §55-8-152.

Attorney General Opinions. Effect of T.C.A. §24-7-124 on admissibility of photographs generated by automated speed detection devices. OAG 10-116, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 122 (12/21/10).

24-7-125. Admissibility of evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts — Conditions for admission.

In a criminal case, evidence of other crimes, wrongs, or acts is not admissible to prove the character of any individual, including a deceased victim, the defendant, a witness, or any other third party, in order to show action in conformity with the character trait. It may, however, be admissible for other purposes. The conditions which must be satisfied before allowing such evidence are:

The court upon request must hold a hearing outside the jury's presence;

The court must determine that a material issue exists other than conduct conforming with a character trait and must upon request state on the record the material issue, the ruling, and the reasons for admitting the evidence;

The court must find proof of the other crime, wrong, or act to be clear and convincing; and

The court must exclude the evidence if its probative value is outweighed by the danger of unfair prejudice.

Acts 2014, ch. 713, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning admissibility of certain character evidence in criminal cases, please refer to Acts 2014, ch. 713.

Acts 2014, ch. 713, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Channon Christian Act”.

Cross-References. Character evidence not admissible to prove conduct, Tenn. R. Evid. 404.

Evidence of character and conduct of witness, Tenn. R. Evid. 608.

Law Reviews.

The Time is Right to Amend Rule 404(b), 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 149 (2014).

24-7-106. Receipts and releases.

24-7-112. Tests to determine parentage — Admissibility in evidence — Costs.